Mississippi, session 2026, HB1773.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 41-137-63, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-137-63.  (1)  (a)  There is established a Medical Cannabis Advisory Committee, which shall be the committee that is required to advise the Legislature about medical cannabis and cannabis products, patient care, services and industry. (b)  The advisory committee shall consist of nine (9) members, as follows: (i)  The Governor shall appoint three (3) members to the committee, as follows: 1.  One (1) representative from the * * *MDOH State Department of Health; 2.  One (1) registered qualifying patient; and 3.  One (1) physician with experience in medical cannabis issues; (ii)  The Lieutenant Governor shall appoint three (3) members, as follows: 1.  One (1) owner or agent of a medical cannabis cultivation facility; 2.  One (1) representative from the * * *MDOH State Department of Health; and 3.  One (1) qualified certified nurse practitioner, physician assistant or optometrist; and (iii)  The Speaker of the House shall appoint three (3) members, as follows: 1.  One (1) owner or agent of a medical cannabis processing facility; 2.  One (1) owner or agent of a medical cannabis dispensary; and 3.  One (1) representative from the * * *MDOR Department of Revenue. (c)  The advisory committee shall meet at least two (2) times per year for the purpose of evaluating and making recommendations to the Legislature and the * * *MDOH State Department of Health and * * *MDOR the Department of Revenue regarding: (i)  The ability of qualifying patients in all areas of the state to obtain timely access to high-quality medical cannabis; (ii)  The effectiveness of the medical cannabis establishments in serving the needs of registered qualifying patients, including the provision of educational and support services by dispensaries, the reasonableness of their prices, security issues, and the sufficiency of the number operating to serve the state's registered qualifying patients; (iii)  The effectiveness of the cannabis testing facilities, including whether a sufficient number are operating; (iv)  The sufficiency of the regulatory and security safeguards contained in this chapter and adopted by the MDOH to ensure that access to and use of cannabis cultivated is provided only to cardholders; (v)  Any recommended additions or revisions to the MDOH and MDOR rules and regulations or this chapter, including relating to security, safe handling, labeling, nomenclature, and whether additional types of licenses should be made available; and (vi)  Any research studies regarding health effects of medical cannabis for patients. (d)  The advisory committee shall accept public comment in writing and in person at least once per year.  The advisory committee shall meet at least two (2) times per year, and advisory committee members shall be furnished written notice of the meetings at least ten (10) days before the date of the meeting. (e)  The chairman of the advisory committee shall be elected by the voting members of the committee annually and shall not serve more than two (2) consecutive years as chairman. (f)  The members of the advisory committee specified in paragraph (b) of this subsection shall serve for terms that are concurrent with the terms of members of the Legislature, and any member appointed under paragraph (b) may be reappointed to the advisory committee.  The members of the advisory committee specified in paragraph (b) shall serve without compensation, but shall receive reimbursement to defray actual expenses incurred in the performance of committee business as authorized by law. (2)  This section shall stand repealed on December 31, * * *2026 2029. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.